Hawaii statutes.
§560:3-704 Personal representative to
proceed without court order; exception. A personal representative shall
proceed expeditiously with the settlement and distribution of a decedent's
estate and, except as otherwise specified or ordered in regard to a supervised
personal representative, do so without adjudication, order, or direction of the
court, but the personal representative may invoke the jurisdiction of the
court, in proceedings authorized by this chapter, to resolve questions
concerning the estate or its administration. [L 1996, c 288, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next